Title
Review for Happiness (1998)
Number of Reviews
22

Author
Murali Krishnan
The title of this film might be initially misleading. It is not a happy
story, but rather, happiness is missing from the lives of most of the
characters. The story is based around three sisters, Trish, Helen, and Joy.
Also involved are their parents, Mona and Lenny, plus Helen's neighbor
Allen.
Trish, the eldest, is married to a successful therapist, Bill. While Bill is
a good husband and a caring father, he is a very disturbed individual, and
has hidden his destructive problem from everyone. Helen is a successful
writer who often feels inadequate, and that perhaps she is a pretentious
fraud. Joy is the youngest, and her family always thought she might not
amount to anything. It appears they were right because Joy is approaching
30, is lonely and single, has no career, and is sweet but generally
unfocused. After many years of marriage, Lenny no longer has feelings for
Mona (or anything for that matter) and wants to live alone. Allen is a
technical professional with no self-esteem. He is neither attractive
physically nor in terms of his personality. He is socially inept, and his
only relationship with women is making obscene phone calls.
Director Todd Solondz brilliantly guides the many intertwined stories
through difficult material. It would have been very easy to let all the
misery bloat the characters into cartoonish caricatures, but this never
happens. Instead, each character is carefully crafted and developed with the
exception of Helen, who is not well realized. Although it is not really a
thriller, an amazing amount of tension is produced by slowly unravelling the
layers of each character. The film runs a long 134 minutes because of the
amount of screen time given all the characters. However, the length is not
tedious because although the characters are often extreme in their
depravity, the progression of the story is never predictable. For example,
when Joy begins a relationship with a refugee student, it is not clear if he
will turn out to be genuine, or a scoundrel as some of the other characters
are presented.
Highly Recommended. This is an engaging character drama with frequent
episodes of black comedy. However, this is a very difficult film to watch.
Many disturbing issues are dealt with in a frank manner, and people who
would not be comfortable with the strong (perverse) sexual content should
avoid this film.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Author
Louis Proyect
This is the first review I've ever written about a movie that I walked
out after only fifteen minutes. It riled me up so much that I had to
pour out my complaint. This movie purports to be some kind of edgy,
"new wavish" social criticism, but as I will point out, it is simply a
version of Saturday Night Live for the carriage trade.
Tod Solonz wrote and directed "Welcome to the Dollhouse," an "indie"
film just like "Happiness," his sophomore and sophomoric follow-up.
"Welcome to the Dollhouse" focuses on the unhappy life of a homely
high school student and her dysfunctional New Jersey middle class
family. The high school itself is just one cut below the concentration
camp depicted in Lina Wertmuller's "Seven Beauties" in terms of
debasement and physical abuse. As somebody who fled high school at the
tender age of 16 to go off to college, the movie struck a resonant
chord with me. The one thing I did have trouble with was the meanness
of the central character, whose losing ways did not inspire her to
turn against the mainstream. She remained anxious to join the
in-groups even though none of them would accept her. I preferred to
thumb my nose at the jocks and the cheerleaders, no matter how many
times this got me beat up.
Since "Welcome to the Dollhouse" received such glowing reviews (still
worth seeing in video), it must have convinced Solonz to make his next
film more of the same. Much more. In fact, too much more.
"Happiness" begins with a prologue involving one of the female leads
and Saturday Night Live alumnus Jon Lovitz. They are on a date in a
fancy restaurant. She, a plain but not unattractive woman in her
mid-30's has just rebuffed Lovitz. He proceeds to give her a
tongue-lashing, telling her that she is "shit" and that he is
"champagne". She sits there passively accepting his insults. This
exercise in humiliation sets the tone for the remainder of the film,
at least I presume it did since I walked out shortly.
Next we meet the woman's sister, a "successful" housewife married to a
psychotherapist, and living in a spacious suburban house. The sister
picks up where Lovitz has left off and in a conversation with her in
the kitchen tells her how much of a loser she is. The sister listens
to the insults passively.
Meanwhile, we discover that the psychotherapist, who is in
psychotherapy himself, is a closeted homosexual who is about to begin
an incestuous relationship with his pubescent son. In a conversation
between the two, the father explains what it means to "come". The
purpose of the scene is not to reveal complexity of character or to
establish dramatic conflict, but rather to shock a jaded audience in
the manner of "epater le bourgeoisie."
When it finally dawned on me that I was seeing an extended Saturday
Night Live sketch, I decided to walk out. The prologue set the tone
for the rest of the film, even to the extent of including a signature
SNL star Jon Lovitz. In the mid-80s, SNL developed a brand of humor
that went hand-in-hand with the dominant Reagan-era sensibility. It
depicted ordinary Americans, either suburbanites or the urban
underclass, as clueless losers. One was supposed to laugh at the
overweight, unsophisticated, culturally backward masses. If you were a
member of this group, you would laugh at yourself in masochistic
fashion. If you were a "hip" college student with more advanced
sensibilities, you got your pleasure in laughing sadistically at the
masses. This aesthetic eventually was reflected in the Letterman show,
where it was honed to perfection.
With Solonz, you are getting the aesthetic overlaid with an
"underground" sensibility. This is not the college fraternity ambiance
of the SNL or Letterman shows, but the lower east side hipster bars
that Solonz presumably attended while attending NYU film school..
Solonz, born in 1960, seems very much a product of this TV/pop culture
environment. He actually produced a short for Saturday Night Live,
titled "How I Became a Leading Artistic Figure in New York City's East
Village Cultural Landscape" in 1986.
The aesthetic of humiliation that Solonz has fine-tuned is shared by
other young film-makers. You will discover it at work in Neil Labute,
who directed the awful and misogynist "In the Company of Men," a film
that I also walked out of after fifteen minutes. His latest, "Friends
and Neighbors," appears closely related thematically and aesthetically
to "Happiness." Mr. Cranky, one of my favorite film reviewers,
describes this Labute film in the following terms:
"The names [of the cast] are straight from the press packet, since I
don't recall hearing them once in the film, which is LaBute's
simplistic way of reinforcing that 'everyman' quality. Barry is
self-absorbed and dependent. Jerry is self-absorbed and co-dependent.
Cary is self-absorbed and psychotic. Mary is indecisive
non-aggressive. Terri is decisive aggressive. Cheri is non-aggressive
co-dependent. Basically, this all amounts to a movie in which not a
person has a clue about anything, and they are all eager to
demonstrate that point in protracted, never-ending conversation."
Sounds like a Saturday Night Live sketch, right?
What interests me above all is the self-delusion that is at work in
directors like Solonz and Labute. They enjoy the reviews they get from
mainstream publications like the NY Times, which represent them as
"daring" and "experimental." But they are not creating anything which
deserves such adjectives. Instead what they are producing is highbrow
versions of television comedy. Television is the ultimate media of
late capitalism. It has the propensity to debase society while
returning maximum profits to the huge corporations which make the
awful spectacle possible. When you watch a Saturday Night Live sketch,
you get the message that you are a piece of shit while having to sit
through beer commercials for the next dose of abuse and degradation.
We should expect much more from a movie.

Author
Bill Chambers
HAPPINESS **** (out of four)
-a review by Bill Chambers (wchamber@netcom.ca)
(Visit my review archive, play some movie trivia, and more!
FILM FREAK CENTRAL
http://www.geocities.com/~billchambers/ )
starring Dylan Baker, Jane Adams, Phillip Seymour Hoffman, Cynthia
Stevenson
written and directed by Todd Solondz
The best movie of the year is, unfortunately, neither an 'entertaining'
nor a mainstream experience. I doubt HAPPINESS will enjoy success as
more than just a critical darling, for Solondz paints an even grimmer
portrait of suburbia than last year's The Ice Storm, as well as his own
Sundance winner, Welcome to the Dollhouse. HAPPINESS is not escapism; it
is a film for grown-ups.
Its narrative structure is Altman-esque. We meet three New Jersey
sisters: Joy Jordan (Adams), a single woman who fears her
passive-aggressive behavior provokes hostility in loved ones; Helen
(Lara Flynn Boyle), a famous poet with a private desire to be dominated;
and Trish (Stevenson), mother of three and wife of reputable
psychiatrist Bill Maplewood (Baker)-Trish is constantly boasting about
her idyllic home-life to her siblings. She is unaware that her shrink
husband lusts after young boys-teeny-bop magazines are fodder for his
obsessions. Nor is Dr. Maplewood above molesting one of his eleven year
old son's friends with the assistance of the date-rape drug. Meanwhile,
his patients are carrying out their own psychosexual
fantasies: Allen, Helen's anonymous, depraved, overweight neighbour,
spends his days as an affable office crony but at night strips down to
his underwear, gets drunk, calls women at random and barks orders at
them of the sort one hears in porno films. (The movie rather amusingly
makes an issue out of *69.) Helen is his fantasy figure, but he is
unable to connect with anyone on a sexually mature level, comfortless in
his own skin. Which makes his verbal abuse of equally portly other
neighbour Kristina (Camryn Manheim) all the more perplexing.
I could go on illustrating the various plot-threads: the Jordan girls'
separated parents (played by Ben Gazzarra and Louise Lasser; to my mind,
this bickering couple are the least compelling aspect of HAPPINESS)
cause perfectionist Trish much consternation, and Joy's difficult
relationship with a Russian refugee cabbie (Jared Harris) confuses Joy
further. (I've only described the tip of this 134 minute iceberg.) Yet
the soul of the film is one story: pedophilic Dr. Maplewood had my
sympathies to the very end, even as I was sickened by his actions. (The
events leading up to a boy's rape earned laughs from a preview audience
of nervous critics, which led a few of them to attack Solondz for
trivializing the subject matter-he didn't.) Baker's portrayal is
captivating and four-dimensional; Maplewood's scenes with loving son
Billy (Rufus Read)-whose own open, innocent desire to experience
ejaculation for the first time forces his father to confront his boy's
burgeoning adolescene at a time when his own secret nature is getting
the best of him-are heartbreaking, to say the least.
If someone were to ask me to summarize HAPPINESS in one awkward
sentence, I would probably respond: a group of characters discover that
acting upon their impulses, sexual and otherwise, will bring them
temporary "happiness"-they seem to have ditched all notions of attaining
it beyond superficially. What is happiness, anyway, and who said it
could/should/would last? Solondz' film, from the charged opening scene
(featuring a cameo by a raging Jon Lovitz!) to the melancholy (yet
controversial) finish, is a breathtakingly naturalistic creation. On the
cinematic side of things, the images seemed oversaturated at times-lawn
greens were so vibrant-looking, it was as if they'd been painted. (And
isn't that the point? Suburbia looks shiny on the surface?) I also
appreciated the old-fashioned title cards-HAPPINESS incidentally shares
its name with a 1924 silent.
Universal's "independent" division (an oxymoron), October, abandoned
Solondz' picture after his final cut turned out to be too "edgy" for
release under the major's banner. So Good Machine (the production
company behind, not ironically, The Ice Storm) is distributing it
instead. It's their first time at bat without support from a major
financier. Show them they took an important risk and see HAPPINESS, a
film for our times.

Author
Greg King
HAPPINESS (R).  
(October Films/Dendy Films)
Director: Todd Solondz
Stars: Jane Adams, Dylan Baker, Lara Flynn Boyle, Ben Gazzara, Philip 
Seymour Hoffman, Cynthia 
Stephenson, Camryn Manheim, Jared Harris, Louise Lasser, Elizabeth 
Ashley, Rufus Read, Jon Lovitz, 
Dan Moran, Evan Silverberg, Matt Malloy 
Running time: 135 minutes.
Todd Solondz is one of America's few truly independent
directors, who doesn't bow to convention or safe formulas.  In his
debut film, Welcome To The Dollhouse, Solondz looked at a
dysfunctional New Jersey family largely through the eyes of the
troubled teenage daughter.  In his disquieting and confronting new
black comedy Happiness, Solondz yet again taps into the lives of a
dysfunctional family from suburban New Jersey and unearths more rich
and fertile material.  Here he also deliberately pushes back the
envelope and tackles some of the few remaining cinematic taboos -
including masturbation and paedophilia - in a brave, frank and
forthright fashion.  Although he is tackling some important themes and
issues, many in the audience will find elements of Happiness
disturbing.
It is a pretty ironic title, as all the characters here are
looking for happiness, but never seem to find it.  Love often ends in
betrayal and hurt and bitterness.  Solondz seems to tap into much that
is wrong with personal relationships and families in the latter part
of the 1990's.  For him, sex is not the answer, it seems to be an
integral part of the problem.  The film concentrates mainly on the
three Jordan sisters, and the narrative follows their interrelated
stories without glossy embellishments or unrealistic or melodramatic
plot devices.
The film unfolds mainly as a series of conversations, which
reveal much about the various characters.  There is a sense of real
pain and anguish lurking just beneath the surface of their seemingly
content and fulfilled lives.  There is an aching loneliness, as they
are all desperately trying to make a connection in a largely uncaring
world.
Trish (Cynthia Stevenson, from Forget Paris, etc) is the
typical suburban housewife, who has no idea that her psychiatrist
husband Bill (Dylan Baker, from Murder One, etc) harbours a secret
lust for young boys.  A seemingly normal family man and father of
three, Bill turns out to be a paedophile who coldly preys on the
vulnerable friends of his 11 year old son.  We watch, appalled yet
morbidly fascinated, as he drugs his own family one night so that he
can take advantage of the young boy who is sleeping over.  While we
never actually see Bill's actions on screen, Solondz still paints a
pretty chilling picture of him as a predator, without remorse or
compunction.  While Adrian Lyne's remake of Lolita is currently
attracting controversy for its depiction of a man's torrid affair with
his 12 year old stepdaughter, Happiness seems to have slipped in under
the guard of the self-appointed and self-important moral watchdogs.
Trish's sister, the self-absorbed and bitchy Helen (Lara Flynn
Boyle, from Twin Peaks, etc) is a best selling author full of self
loathing and pity, who looks down on her two sisters.  She develops a
relationship with an obscene phone caller (Philip Seymour Hoffman,
also appearing opposite Robin Williams in the far more mainstream
comedy Patch Adams), who turns out to be her next door neighbour.
Taking a plunge, she decides to invites him in one evening.  The
meeting unfolds in an uncomfortable, embarrassing silence that is
abruptly ended when she throws him out of her apartment, declaring
that he is not her type.  Helen's other neighbour is Kristina (The
Practice's Camryn Manheim), a lonely and overweight murderess.
The other sister, Joy (Jane Adams, from Kansas City, etc), is
the pitiful, insecure and naive loser who lurches from one hapless and
unsatisfactory encounter to the next, yet remains full of optimism.
Solondz also introduces us to their parents (Ben Gazzara and Louise
Lasser), who live in Florida, but are in the throes of a separation
after forty years of marriage.
Happiness has something of an Altmanesque quality to it, as
Solondz draws together with deceptive ease and skill the disparate
plots and characters.  Solondz draws wonderful and perceptive
performances from his ensemble cast that bring this collection of
colourful losers to life.  Especially good is Baker, who gets under
the skin of his character and manages to make him more sympathetic
than you would expect.
Happiness is, by turns, sardonic, cruel, relentlessly
uncompromising, earthy, funny, poignant, honest, confronting,
compassionate, insightful, uncomfortable, bleak, despairing, and
challenging.  Many may well find it tasteless and shocking.  Solondz
balances his observations about life, love and other bruises with
humour and casual horror.  Some scenes are excruciatingly
uncomfortable to watch.  Happiness is a powerful and provocative film
that cuts close to the bone, yet lingers in the mind long after the
final credits.

Author
Dustin Putman
Directed by Todd Solondz.
Cast: Jane Adams, Dylan Baker, Philip Seymour Hoffman, Lara Flynn Boyle, 
Cynthia Stevenson, Camryn Manheim, Louise Lasser, Ben Gazzara, Rufus 
Read, Jared Harris, Elizabeth Ashley, Jon Lovitz, Marla Maples, Anne 
Bobby, Molly Shannon.
1998 - 140 minutes
Not Rated (by the MPAA standards, the equivalent of NC-17 for profanity, 
violence, brief sex, masturbation, nudity, and disturbing subject 
matter).
Reviewed April 29, 1999.
Note: This review may include elements that are possible spoilers; if 
you haven't seen the film yet, and plan to, read with caution.
Acclaimed independent director Todd Solondz is not, and I repeat not, a 
fluke. Since making the criminally overlooked 1989 gem, "Fear, Anxiety, 
and Depression" and the brilliant, uncompromising 1996 "Welcome to the 
Dollhouse," Solondz has proven that he has a very distinct and 
on-the-mark way of coming up with original characters set against the 
backdrop of dire, seriously downbeat stories, and then, somehow, is able 
to make them funny. Not a one-liner sort of funny, but the sort of funny 
that comes from wonderously accurate situations in which comedy 
naturally shines through, even as we are suffering along with the people 
on-screen. Solondz's latest film, "Happiness," which is now available on 
video and DVD after a controversial but much-heralded run in theaters 
(its original distributor, Universal, dropped the film after being 
scared off with the dark subject matter, only for the indie company, 
Good Machine Productions, to graciously snap it up). And after finally 
seeing the film, I have two comments concerning this: (1) words fail me 
to think that Universal can snub this masterful piece of work, but then 
release such "award winners" as the horror joke-fest, "Bride of Chucky," 
and the schmaltzy, embarrassingly sentimental, "Patch Adams"; and (2) 
why exactly did this film recieve an initial NC-17 rating, only to drop 
it and go unrated? Sure, the material that is dealt with reaches into 
the darkest depths of human nature, but not even a miniscule second of 
it is in any way exploitative, and the two infamous ejaculation scenes 
aren't even as graphically displayed as in 1998's R-rated box-office 
hit, "There's Something About Mary." I guess since "...Mary" reached for 
the lowest-common-denominator, while "Happiness" dealt with its 
characters and situations truthfully, the MPAA didn't know how to react 
to something so intelligent. 
In true Altmanesque style, a 'la "Nashville" and "Short Cuts," 
"Happiness" interweaves several different stories together into a 
perfectly-woven tapestry that is admittedly quite ironic, since the 
title of the film is the farthest possible feeling away that any of the 
miserable characters presented here could be. The picture centers on 
three New Jersey-based sisters and the people around them, all of which 
have their definite problems and eccentricities. Joy Jordan (Jane Adams) 
is the youngest of the three, a recently-turned thirty-year-old who 
still lives at her parent's home, writes songs and plays the guitar in 
her spare time, seems destined to get involved in loser guys, and is 
told early on by her sister, Trish (Cynthia Stevenson), that everyone 
always thought she would be a failure. Trish, the oldest sister, is a 
joyful housewife and mother of three who naively does not know that her 
psychiatrist husband, Bill Maplewood (Dylan Baker), is secretly a 
pedophile who often buys children's magazines to get off on them and 
seems to be headed down a path of destruction. And finally, the third 
sister, Helen (Lara Flynn Boyle), is a much-admired writer who is 
growing bored of her artificial and aimless relationships with men and 
believes that her own writing is terrible. Two of her poems, entitled 
"Rape at 11" and "Rape at 12," lead her to ultimately wish that she had
 been raped as a child, simply so she could be authentic. Helen becomes 
intrigued one day when she recieves an anonymous obscene phone call that 
is actually coming from her nerdy, insecure, and overweight neighbor, 
Allen (Philip Seymour Hoffman), who randomly chooses numbers in the 
phone book and calls the women up, only to spit out sexual and verbal 
threats upon them. 
As you can already see, the peoples' lives that inhabit "Happiness" 
certainly aren't made up of sugar and spice and everything nice, and 
many of the depressed or unusual characters haven't even been mentioned, 
including the Jordan sisters' parents, Mona and Lenny (Louise Lasser and 
Ben Gazzara), who are getting separated after forty years of marriage; 
Bill and Trish's 11-year-old son, Billy (Rufus Read), who has recently 
become concerned that he hasn't been able to "cum" yet; another neighbor 
of Allen's, Kristina (Camryn Manheim), an obese, lonely woman who is 
harboring a dark secret of her own concerning the death of the apartment 
buiding's doorman; an angry possible suitor (Jon Lovitz) of Joy's who 
practically snaps her in half with crushingly mean-spirited words after 
she breaks up with him; and another one of Joy's troubled romances, Vlad 
(Jared Harris), who is a Russian taxi driver and thief.
Todd Solondz's "Happiness" is one of the most startlingly courageous and 
assured films of 1998, a movie that takes these wide variety of 
off-centered character, all of which could have easily been transformed 
into caricatures, but instead, treats them honestly and openly as 
(severely) flawed, but strangely likable human beings, some of which you 
may find yourself surprisingly sharing characteristics with as the film 
presses on. "Happiness" is filled to bursting with incredibly harsh and 
painful emotions, but as is standard with Solondz, much of it is 
downright hilarious as well, and intentionally so. It wouldn't be too 
great of a shock to actually find youself ashamed at almost inexplicably 
laughing at certain very human situations, as well as the characters 
themselves. After only three films, it is obvious that Solondz is one of 
the masters of flawlessly intermingling both pitch-black comedy and 
heartbreaking drama, sometimes at the very same moment.
Because of the fine line the film is constantly walking on between 
realism and ludicrousness, it was vital that the screenplay, by Solondz, 
and the many performances not be merely adequate, and they aren't. The 
writing is particularly effective because of the facile way that it 
moves from one group of characters to the next, and then back again, all 
the while constantly coming up with fresh, stirring, humorous, and 
devastating situations. In the one previously mentioned scene that is 
obviously so emotionally damaging for Joy, Trish tells her the truth 
about how everyone feels negatively about her path in life, foolishly 
unaware that words really do hurt.
In the acting department, "Happiness" has acquired several well-known 
actors (but not overly so) as well as some first-timers in a starring 
role. Jane Adams, whom has previously been seen in such small roles as 
1995's "Father of the Bride II" and 1998's "Music From Another Room," is 
the one truly kind character, as Joy, and Adams brings out all of her 
appropriate emotions, including the confusion that she feels for what 
she wants to do in her life. Joy loves playing the guitar and writing 
songs, but is hesitant to show them to anyone, and moves from one job 
(as a telephone operator) to another (a teacher for distrusting foreign 
refugees!). One very funny scene, due to the so-genuine-it's-scary way 
that the characters react, occurs when another worker at the telephone 
job dies, but when she tells one of her co-workers (Molly Shannon) all 
about him, a budding conversation erupts around the office as everyone 
else tries to figure out who he was, even though he worked with all of 
them for a whole year. 
As Trish, Stevenson is perfect as the unsuspecting wife and mother who 
"has it all," even though she is clueless to her husband's very serious 
and criminal problem. In perhaps the best performance in the film, Dylan 
Baker is remarkable and sincere as the chronic child-molesting Bill, and 
what is even more astounding is how much we are able to sympathize and 
care about him, even after we watch him in one disturbing, nerve-racking 
scene, drug his whole family and his son's playmate at a sleepover, just 
so he can have his way with the young child. The brutally honest 
relationship between Bill and his son, Billy, is also highly 
confounding, since they are able to speak to each other with such 
unabashed frankness, and about the most personal things imaginable.
Philip Seymour Hoffman is amusing as the rather pathetic and shy Allen, 
as his main hobby, we find, is simply making obscene phone calls. 
Clearly, he has terminally low self-esteem, so when he finally rings up 
Helen who, in response, calls him back with *69 and tells him to call 
her again some other time, he doesn't know how to respond. His 
blossoming romance with his neighbor, Kristina, is one of the more 
touching elements in the film. As played poignantly by Camryn Manheim 
(TV's "The Practice"), Kristina keeps coming over to talk to Allen 
because she likes him, but he thoughtlessly ignores her, even though she 
is exactly what he has been looking for all along: a loving, caring 
relationship.
Also of special notice is Lara Flynn Boyle as the third sister, Helen. 
Boyle has always been an actress I've kept my eye on, and she deserves 
more challenging and satisfying work, such as this film. Louise Lasser 
is a hoot as the sisters' aging mother, a sarcastic, precarious woman 
who, in one of the funniest scenes, spots her husband's possible 
mistress walking down the street and immediately begins to aim her car 
right for her, only to pull out of it at the last minute and wave to her 
as she passes by. Jon Lovitz also makes quite an impression in the 
attention-getting opening scene, especially since he is playing someone 
so unlike any other character I've seen him portray.
Although it's almost foolish to compare such two recently great films, 
"Happiness" does not quite reach the overall height of Solondz's 
masterpiece, "Welcome to the Dollhouse," but nor should it have to. With 
this latest motion picture, Solondz has taken a gigantic risk, and with 
so many characters, it's inevitable that a few moments would feel 
marginally uneven. At a sizable running time of 140 minutes, the film is 
never, ever boring and the time flies by. If Solondz had failed with 
this film, it would have been damaging to his career because of the many 
chances that are taken, but he grandly succeeds in almost everything he 
has set out to do. Yes, most of the characters are outlandish, at times 
dangerous, people that you wouldn't really want to meet, but what 
Solondz has done is taken these extreme characters to bring us a 
portrait of lonely, seemingly meaningless lives that most likely stand 
for our own. No one in "Happiness" is actually happy, but they 
persistently strive to be just that. God, don't we all?
Dustin Putman's Film 
Haven 

Author
Jerry Saravia
"Happiness" is one of the richest, darkly complex, and ironically funniest
portraits of American life since "Short Cuts." It is tinged with irony, deadpan
humor, and some severely unpleasant subject matter, though always treated in a
respectful, artful manner by a promising writer-director, Todd Solondz. Solondz
previously directed "Welcome to the Dollhouse," a provocative statement about
growing up in Jersey, but who would have thought he would helm a multi-layered,
disturbing portrait of Jersey like this one.
The film begins with a date at a restaurant. The curly-haired brunette Joy (Jane
Adams) is sitting at a table with a man (John Lovitz) whom she has just dumped.
He questions her, trying to discover why the relationship is over. He shows her
an engraved ashtray, and tells her it's for the person who will love him for who
he is. 
Afterwards, we meet the orange-haired Allen (the great Philip Seymour Hoffman),
a guy who masturbates on the phone while arbitrarily picking names off the phone
book and asking the women what they are wearing. Not only does he stalk people
on the phone at home, but also at his office where he works. When he confesses
his explicit sexual fantasies to a therapist, Bill (Dylan Baker), we recognize
boredom is settling on the therapist's face. We hear his thoughts in voice-over.
We see a strange dream where he kills everyone in a playground with a machine
gun. Then he masturbates while looking at teen magazines, and we realize his
true nature: he's a pedophile.
Then we are introduced to Joy's sisters, which include Trish (Cynthia
Stevenson), a bland, perfect housewife unaware of her husband's (Bill's)
clandestine sexual nature, and Helen (Lara Flynn Boyle), a poet who writes about
rapes, and finds that New Jersey is the ideal place to live to prove you're not
a showy writer. 
There is also Joy's unhappy parents, Lenny (Ben Gazzara) and Mona (Louise
Lasser, a long way from "Bananas"). Lenny wants out of the marriage so he can
live his life, yet Mona understandably thinks that it is because of her and that
she's too fat and needs a facelift. When Mona asks for advice from a real-estate
dealer (amusingly played by Marla Maples) about her marriage, the dealer
responds: "Divorce is the best thing that ever happened to me." 
Joy needs and wants love desperately, but doesn't know what love is. Her sisters
berate her about their perfect, exciting lives yet she feels cast out of the
family. When not being sexually harassed on the phone (by Allen), she confides
in a thick-accented Russian taxi driver (Jared Harris), who has sex with her and
patiently listens to one of her guitar-playing songs. Of course, he turns out to
be a thief, and is married! 
Everyone in "Happiness" has difficulty adapting to their lifestyles, and they
are all inadequate about their loved ones. Interestingly, they all feel a brink
of happiness when they are alone. Allen lives by himself in a bland apartment
and is giddy when making anonymous calls; Joy feels better when playing the
guitar to herself; Lenny can't bring himself to have an affair and chooses to be
left alone; and Bill wants to be left alone with his son's male friends by
drugging everyone with sleeping pills. Only a secondary character named Kristina
(Camryn Manheim), Allen's neighbor, needs solace when she admits her own secrets
to Allen. 
"Happiness" is an exemplary combination of flawless writing, directing and
acting. It is shrewdly written by Solondz, and he never makes it easy for the
audience when he wavers between drama and comedy with unusual results. At times,
you don't know whether to laugh, cringe, or both. The most obvious example is
when Bill admits his secret sexual desires to his son - it is so painful to
watch that we are not sure how to respond to it. This is true of Kristina's
secret, which causes one to laugh because it is so unexpected.
The performances are so adeptly attuned to the material that you can't separate
one actor from the other - they fit the roles perfectly. One lasting impression
is left by character actor Dylan Baker (who should be remembered at Oscar time)
as the disturbed pedophile. His face is so haunting and etched with so much pain
that he becomes unforgettable - he also brings a sense of humanity to Bill that
makes it harder to judge him as a person. He tries, in one scene, to tell his
wife that he is sick, yet he can't help his nature. 
Solondz has not crafted an exploitative fantasy where the freaks are on display
for everyone to identify - a modern-day Jerry Springer-like movie where the
audience can boo the loveless characters off the screen. Instead, he addresses
these characters as normal, everyday people facing their own crisis, their own
lack of understanding, and their own inability to love. He looks at everyone
with a sympathetic eye, including the pedophile, and cuts deeply into our
consciousness about our human needs. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Author
Gary Jones
Happiness, written and directed by Todd Solondz, won the International
Critics' Prize at Cannes last year. It is an extremely frank and
disturbing look at the emotional horror stories that exist under the
surface of the lives of several apparently everyday American
suburbanites. The characters' lives intersect in various ways, as if to
suggest that the film has not just chosen a few freaks to examine, but
that the awfulness of what goes on in the film is quite normal.
The interweaving stories show the ways in which the characters seek
happiness and uniformly fail. These include a woman's doomed romances,
an obscene phone caller who stumbles into a pathetic relationship with
an overweight and lonely neighbour, the breakdown of a late middle-aged
couple's marriage, an 11-year old boy's first experiments with
masturbation and, most unsettling of all, the boy's father's appalling
sexual abuse of two of his son's friends. It is this aspect of the film
that is truly shocking. The son, embarrassed and confused about his
stirring sexuality, goes to his father for advice. The father's calm but
frank comments can be seen either as a model of open and supportive
parenting, or as an attempt at a gross seduction. The scenes in which
the father plots his assaults are uncomfortable enough to watch, but the
scene in which he admits to his son what he has done, and describes it
with brutal candour, is almost unbearable. Despite the monstrous things
this paedophile does, he is not portrayed as a monster, but rather as a
pathetic character whom we can almost feel some sympathy for. It is this
that has provoked some to call the film morally repugnant.
The other story lines are hardly light-hearted, and there is a rape and
murder thrown in for good measure, but there is nevertheless a strange
humour, fuelled by embarrassment, running through much of the film. The
cast is uniformly excellent, although Dylan Baker deserves special
mention for his portrayal of the paedophile father.
I was not looking forward to seeing Happiness, but felt it was a film I
had to see. I can't say I enjoyed it very much, but it is as emotionally
involving and challenging as cinema can get.
-- 
Gary Jones 
Homepage: www.bohr.demon.co.uk
PGP public key available from servers (DH/DSS key ID: 0x11EAE903)

Author
Dennis Schwartz

HAPPINESS (director: Todd Solondz; cast: Dylan Baker, Jane Adams, Philip
Seymour Hoffman, Cynthia Stevenson, Lara Flynn Boyle, Jared Harris,
Rufus Read, Ben Gazzara, Louise Lasser, Camryn Manheim, 1998)
HAPPINESS is not a film about happiness, because happiness is not real
but imagined, therefore no one can stay happy in a world where sadness
is the more prevalent emotional state. So goes the theme of this dark
comedy, meant to shock and antagonize you into looking at people you
cannot readily identify with, in a film that features a pedophile rapist
(Dylan), a murderer (Camyrn), an obscene caller (Hoffman), a masturbator
(Read), a Russian immigrant thief (Jared), and an assortment of losers
and lonely people wrapped up in their egos, as Solondz's morbid sense of
humor turns to New Jersey's suburbs to explore the depravity of the
human race.
This is an honestly made film that refuses to compromise on its plot or
who should be cast in it (Solondz refused the studio's offer to cast the
pedophile with a noted star such as, William Hurt, because he felt Dylan
was just right for the role). This film is meant for an art house type
of audience, one that is able, as difficult as it may be, to see
something in themselves in the characters portrayed on screen. I would
wonder about anyone who could  sit through this film and not be
disturbed by it, that would just defeat its purpose. The audience I saw
this film with, were mostly Williams College students and faculty, and
they laughed openly and freely at the parts that had an edge to it,
where Solondz was going for the laugh because he pushed the button as
far as he wanted to go with a certain character and, in order to return
to the intensely grim psychological mood of the story, he had to release
some humorous energy or have the film drown in its own murky waters. The
laughter was appropriate, and even "hip," as it felt right to see this
with an audience that still felt the need to be entertained when they go
to the movies, and it didn't seem to matter if the laughter came about
from the cruel humor it evoked, causing people to react as a group
rather than individually. I found that most people in the audience
appeared to be nervously silent; and, there was at no time just one
person alone laughing (but, the best part, is that only one person
walked out of the theater and no one hissed).
HAPPINESS is a difficult picture to watch, there are no good guys or
gals. In order for it to work as a complete film, one has to accept the
interrelated tales of three different types of sisters and their
relationship with their miserable parents, Gazzara and Lasser, (who
don't love each other and are not happy whatever they do; he has given
up on everything, including getting a divorce; and, she feels a need to
cling to this loveless marriage, no matter what).
The sisters all suffer from ego-centredness, and it takes an audience
with a modicum of sympathy for each of them to get past all the vices
each of them has, as each one in this story only pretends to be
interested in anyone but themselves.
Jane Adams plays Joy, who is anything but joyous, as she cries through
most of the film, having no luck at finding the right job or man. Trish
(Cynthia) is the oldest and seemingly the most content, parroting all
the facile virtues of middle America, living out the American dream with
her three wonderful kids and successful psychologist husband (Dylan),
who is gentle and understanding, but hides from her the fact that he is
a pervert and a pedophile. It is also interesting to note in the
analysis he undergoes, that he only tells his analyst the dreams he
wants to tell, seemingly to satisfy the analyst and not damage his
career, while he neglects to tell the analyst his true sexual feelings.
Solondz closes the door for any of his characters to get the help they
need.
Lara Flynn Boyle plays Helen, the successful author who can't stand who
she is, who is so full of herself, constantly harping to her sisters how
she has been with so many good looking men and is never lonely but
complains that she just has too much to do. She is, also, materially
very well-off; and, condescending to her sisters.This illusion of her
good life is shattered when an obscene caller, a nerdy computer guy,
Hoffman, turns her on with one of his calls and she makes a date with
him, even after he hangs up on her, but he is apparently afraid of her
too willing response to his proposition, so their relationship fizzles
out. By chance, he is also undergoing analysis with our shrink, Dylan,
so you know what kind of help he is getting for his problems.
The most poignant and unflinching scenes in the film are between the
accused pedophile father and his son (Read), as Dylan, who is superb in
his role,  honestly counsels his 11-year-old son about masturbation, and
later on, has the difficult task of telling his son that he drugged and
raped his son's friend and then raped one of his other friends and would
do it again because he can't control himself. I could understand people
being upset with this character, as this character is given a forum to
tell us what he is about, and as difficult as it is to feel anything but
contempt for him, we at least see what this type of person looks like up
close and we can ascertain that he is human, no other film, to my
knowledge, has done this so thoroughly, and has done it so humanely and
perceptively, in fact, very few films would have enough balls to touch
this subject; Lang's M, with Peter Lorre, does to a certain degree, but
Lang's film was different in nature, and just touched bases with the
peripheral nature of the problem, he never pushed it to the front of the
film and into the face of the audience; his was mostly a noir crime
story, while Solondz's film centers on exploring one's disturbing
emotional states.
This is a very solid film, that is well-acted, that is understandably
not for everyone, yet because it takes risks on subjects that are tabu,
and even though some of the risks seemed contrived and not a part of the
natural story line, this is still a powerful film, one deserving of
attention and intelligent critique, one deserving of thanks from those
of us who welcome a true effort for the sake of art, even if the art has
to sink into the mud to have its story told. Many filmmakers have
approached the subject of happiness by tacking on a happy ending to
their films.That is not the case with this film, obviously.This film
leaves you little choice, you can take this film as morbid and amusing
as it is, or you can ignore it, or you can find no one in it that you
feel some sort of compassion for, and therefore come to hate it. I came
close to loving it, while not exactly loving it, mainly because there
were too many scenes in it that left me with mixed feelings and
messages. But close to loving it, means I liked it a lot for its honesty
to subject matter and character. I did, however, think that these
characters went too far in their portrayals for me to relate to them
without either feeling sorry for them or despising them.
Š ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Steve Rhodes
For those of you who thought Neil LaBute's latest cinematic diatribe,
YOUR FRIENDS & NEIGHBORS, was too upbeat, HAPPINESS is just the film for
you.
Writer and director Todd Solondz, who burst onto the motion picture
landscape a couple of years ago with the widely acclaimed WELCOME TO THE
DOLLHOUSE, is back with his second film, HAPPINESS, which is about
people who are anything but.
(For the record, I had Solondz's first picture at the absolute top of my
best of the year list in 1996.  It was the best example in years of what
an indie film could be.  It had unknown actors in a low budget
production that had more insights and depth than ten normal films.  The
actors in it have not had much subsequent success, but, since the
movie's brilliance stemmed mainly from the director's creative energies,
Solondz's second film has been much anticipated.)
The first pair of the many bitterly cruel and shallow characters we meet
in HAPPINESS are Joy Jordan and Andy Kornbluth, played by Jane Adams and
Jon Lovitz.  At a fancy restaurant, Joy is breaking up with Andy.
Devastated, Andy wants to know if it is because there is someone else.
"No," a smiling Joy reassures him.  "It's you."  And Joy is the nicest
character in the movie.  Andy comes unglued with this brutal display of
honesty.
Critics see such a wide variety of films that we become fairly thick
skinned, but this film managed to create major feelings of revulsion in
me.  HAPPINESS, a probable winner in the "downer movie of the decade"
category, tries hard to shock its audience and succeeds.  Murder,
masturbation, pedophilia, suicide and numerous forms of vicious human
behavior, it has them all in abundance.
Unlike his mesmerizing first endeavor, Solondz's second film offers few
insights, contenting itself with operating solely on the surface level.
Like a facade on a movie set, if you look beneath the glossy surface and
the talented cast, there's not much there.  The relentless happy music
may lure some into snickering, which would be rather akin to laughing
during a funeral.
Philip Seymour Hoffman plays a flabby, obscene caller named Allen, who
is almost incapable of even conversing with a female.  The details of
his sexual behavior during these calls are shown graphically and
unapologetically.
One of Allen's calls goes to Helen Jordan (Lara Flynn Boyle), one of
Joy's two sisters.  Gorgeous Helen is a writer who thinks her latest
book, "Pornographic Childhood," failed because her life has been too
tame.   As she flips through the book, we see that it includes poems
entitled, "Rape at Eleven" and "Rape at Twelve."  When Allen places an
obscene phone call to her, she uses "*69" to call him back to ask for a
date.
Cynthia Stevenson plays Joy's other sister, Trish Maplewood, a chirpy
housewife whose solution to Joy's depression is to suggest that she eat
red meat once a month.  Dylan Baker plays Bill Maplewood, the Ozzie to
Trish's Harriet.  They live a perfect suburban lifestyle.  Well, there
are a few flaws in their domestic bliss.
Bill has a recurring series of nightmares in which he is a mass murderer
with an automatic rifle, but they've been getting better lately.  At the
end of the dream, he no longer kills himself after gunning down everyone
else at the park.
Bill has bigger problems than his dreams.  He is a happily practicing
pedophile.  He makes no apologies for molesting his 11-year-old son's
male friends.  And when he keeps asking his son if he's been practicing,
he's not talking about his baseball pitch.
Besides the excellent acting, there are many things to admire in
HAPPINESS.  There is a great Dilbert moment, when Joy tells her fellow
cubical dwellers that an ex-cubical inhabitant has died.  The cubites
are abuzz over the tops of their little partitions trying, without any
success, to remember the deceased.  She gets so frustrated that she
finally agrees with them even though they have remembered the wrong
coworker.
And any movie that features an incessantly perky Marla Maples, in a
powder blue, real estate agent suit, giving advice on divorce has
something going for it.
Films can be hard to take and yet extremely rewarding -- IN THE COMPANY
OF MEN, for example.  It is fine for films to be hard to stomach if the
payoff is there, but HAPPINESS provides none.  It pushes the envelope of
decency only to see how far it can go, like some child pushing the
limits to see how much he can get away with.
Leaving the theater, your reaction is liable to be complete disgust as
if you have been violated in some insidious way. HAPPINESS is such a gut
wrenching experience that they should give out "I survived HAPPINESS!"
T-shirts in the lobby afterwards.
HAPPINESS runs needlessly long at 2:14 as if Solondz wants to prolong
the agony.  The film isn't rated but would be NC-17 for suicide, murder,
rape, masturbation, violence, sex, profanity, pedophilia, etc.  The film
is for adults only.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: www.InternetReviews.com

Author
Scott Renshaw
HAPPINESS
(Good Machine)
Starring:  Jane Adams, Dylan Baker, Philip Seymour Hoffman, Lara Flynn
Boyle, Cynthia Stevenson, Camryn Manheim, Ben Gazarra, Louise Lasser.
Screenplay:  Todd Solondz.
Producers:  Ted Hope and Christine Vachon.
Director:  Todd Solondz.
MPAA Rating:  Not Rated (sexual situations, adult themes, profanity).
Running Time:  135 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     HAPPINESS is almost too difficult to watch -- not because of its
potentially shocking content, but because it's so achingly sad.  Lonely
men make obscene phone calls which only seem to make them more frustrated.
Stabs at romance turn into depressing one-night stands.  A few moments of
isolated contact quickly vanish in a rage of rejection.  The dozen or so
principal characters in Todd Solondz's bleakly funny suburban nightmare
fumble and fail so consistently in their pursuit of happiness you might
suspect it was unattainable.
     And, in the sense that some of them define it, it is.  HAPPINESS
deals with people whose chances for contentment are thwarted by yearnings
for things they can't have, or have been led to believe they _should_ have
by cultural signals like the shmaltz love ballads that permeate the
soundtrack.  Joy (Jane Adams), a single aspiring songwriter, feels she
should have a man and a stable life like her married older sister Trish
(Cynthia Stevenson); Trish, a housewife, feels inferior to sister Helen
(Lara Flynn Boyle), a successful author; Helen, meanwhile, wants a life of
danger to give her writing "authenticity."  Helen's lonely, obscene
phone-calling neighbor Allen (Philip Seymour Hoffman) longs for Helen
while considering her inaccessible, even as he becomes the object of
similar feelings from even lonelier neighbor Kristina (Camryn Manheim).
Solondz fills his world with people who want what they haven't got, never
realizing how much it could cost them.
     Nowhere is that more evident than in HAPPINESS' trickiest character,
Trish's husband Bill (Dylan Baker).  A successful therapist, Bill also
happens to be a pedophile who has unnervingly frank sexual discussions
with his 11-year-old son Billy (Rufus Read) and molests Billy's classmates
during sleepovers.  Baker gives Bill so many layers that he always seems 
human even through his predatory calculation.  His attempt to cajole
Billy's young friend into eating a drugged sandwich is as pathetic as it
is creepy, his parental concern as genuine as it is tainted.  Solondz is
never merely interested in the sensationalistic but trite notion that the
monsters who turn up in headlines are our neighbors.  He wants us to see
the misery of a monster who knows that he's causing pain but can't stop
himself because causing it at least for a moment eases his own.
     It's even more unsettling that Solondz sets Bill at one far end of
a continuum of pain selfishly inflicted in the desperate search for
fulfillment.  Allen humiliates women he calls in an attempt to feel
significant; the sisters' father (Ben Gazzara) abandons his wife in search
of something even another woman can't provide; Joy dumps a boyfriend (a
scathing cameo by Jon Lovitz) who may be a sensitive guy.  There are no
grand enlightenments in HAPPINESS, which may make it seem that Solondz is
simply reveling in the characters' degradation.  The fact is they're
merely deeply flawed, some making small steps towards defining their own
happiness, others too immersed in external definitions to be ready for
those small steps.
     Solondz's one real mis-step -- aside from the unnecessarily long
running time -- involves a murder/rape sub-plot which launches HAPPINESS
into an unnecessarily surreal direction.  The film doesn't need the cheap
laughs from references to cut up body parts in freezer bags, not when it
offers edgy humor that's so much more uncomfortably genuine.  A key scene
in HAPPINESS finds Billy sharing concerns with his father that he's not
"normal" because he may not be maturing sexually as fast as his peers.
It's brutally ironic that he's asking for advice on normalcy from a man
who may be nobody's paradigm of normalcy, but at least he's receiving
reassurance that he's not alone in his confusion.  The paralyzing pursuit
of "normalcy" is what makes so many of the people in HAPPINESS so
unhappy. Solondz turns what could have been a freak show into a
reassurance that we, too, are not alone in being something other than
"normal."

Author
Matt Prigge
Writer/Director: Todd Solandz
Starring: Dylan Baker, Cynthia Stevenson, Jane Adams, Lara Flynn Boyle,
Philip Seymour Hoffman, Rufus Read, Camryn Manheim, Louise Lasser, Ben
Gazzara, Jared Harris, Elizabeth Ashley, Jon Lovitz, Dan Moran, Evan
Silverberg, Marla Maples, Molly Shannon
Like a god, Todd Solandz circles around his characters in "Happiness,"
as if he were spinning some wheel where each of the major characters
were represented, and then stops on one and fills us in on their lives.
They all have two things in common: they're all, to some degree,
unhappy; and in some way, they all get what they desire most of all by
the end of the movie.  Each of them harbor dark, deep secrets, and the
materialization of each of them is the subject of this film.  Meanwhile,
round and round the film goes, stopping on each of the characters, and
when he does, we see them as they really are, without any filter, their
souls bare naked for the screen to behold and for Solandz and the rest
of us to judge them.
Yet he doesn't, and neither do we, and that's probably the most
refreshing thing about this film, amongst a pile of other refreshing
things this film has to offer any audience that will have it.  Back in
1996, the very same director shocked audiences with his film, "Welcome
to the Dollhouse," a black comedy about a junior high girl who was the
biggest dork in her class.  That film bordered on sadistic at times, but
still retained a quiet, observant, yet very funny atmosphere.  I think
the amazing thing about Solandz is that his view is not only hysterical
and witty, but walks right up to the line dictating which side is
sensible and reserved, and which side is flat out pretentious
down-talking.  And he doesn't trip over it.
In "Happiness," we meet a wide array of interesting and realistic
people, all with subconscious problems they are trying to deal with.  At
the center of the film are three sisters, though they aren't the primary
specimens, but merely the key to why these people are connected -
there's Trish (Cynthia Stevenson), the one with the perfect family,
perfect husband, and perfect suburban life; Helen (Lara Flynn Boyle),
the gorgeously sophistocated one with a major writing career who
nevertheless feels shallow and hates her work; and Joy (Jane Adams), a
naive, almost vapid songstress who is pure and sweet, but in the very
first scene, dumps her current boyfriend (a shockingly hilarious and
even intense Jon Lovitz), and it's probably because he's an ugly dead
end.  He takes it sadly at first, then tries to make uncomfortably comic
conversation, giving her a present he was going to give her later on: a
specially-engraved, beautiful ashtray (she says "It almost makes me want
to learn how to smoke.").  He then shocks her by pulling it away from
her, saying that it's not for her but for the one who loves him for who
he is, not what he looks like.
While Joy takes a job working as a substitute for on-strike
english-as-a-second-language teacher (they refer to her as a "scab"), we
get to know everyone else, and discover their little idosyncrasies.  We
meet a man named Allen (Philip Seymour Hoffman, who was brilliant in
"Boogie Nights" as the boom mike operator with a crush on Marky Mark), a
boring office worker, a mouth breather who masturbates while making
obscene phone calls to women.  He's currently lusting over Helen, who
lives next door to him in his apartment building, though another woman
in his building, Kristina (Camryn Manheim, who just won an Emmy for her
acting on the TV show, "The Practice"), gets a crush on him, even though
she has very low self esteem herself.
Most shockingly, though, we meet Trish's husband, Bill (Dylan Baker), a
psychiatrist, namely Allen's psychiatrist, who urges him to tell him all
his sexual fantasies, but himself, keeps having a recurring dream where
he walks into a gorgeous park on a sunny day with a machine gun.  He's
the perfect husband, though, or at least in Trish's eye, but in one of
the first scenes of the movie, he goes to a gas station, buys a Teen
Beat magazine, climbs into the back seat of his car, and jacks off to
the pictures.
And down in Florida, the parents of the three sisters, Mona and Lenny
(Louise Lasser and Ben Gazzara, the former who has not at all aged
well), who've been married for decades, are splitting up because for the
first time in his life, Lenny wants to be alone.  Although Lenny denies
it has anything to do with wanting to be with other women, this still
drives Mona to re-evaluate her life, and maybe come to terms with the
idea that, as the local realtor she talks to (Marla Maples - !!!) says,
divorce may be the best thing that ever happens to her.
Once all these characters are introduced, Solandz, like a genie, grants
all of them their wishes.  When Allen calls Helen and does his usual
schtick, she shocks him by replying with "I want to meet you."  Lenny
gets the separation, and finds he has attracted the come-ons of a
neighbor of his (Elizabeth Ashley).  Joy meets a Russian cab driver
named Vlad (Jared Harris) in her class, and he woos her by playing an
absolutely riot-inducing cover of "You Light Up My Life" one night at
her house (the joke is that it works).  Most unsettling of all, Bill
gets a crush on one of his son's friends, organizes a sleepover for the
two, and in a scene that is eerily comic in its enactment, Bill attempts
to drug the family and the boy, and then have his way with him...though
it hardly goes as planned.
"Happiness" is an unsettling shocker, filled with insights about
humanity and our internal desire to be happy at all costs, and set up
around scenes that are created to shock the audience.  Cum shots (in
fact, 2 or 3 of them).  Pedophilia (though it is never seen on screen).
Even Bill's numerous discussions with his son (Rufus Read) about sexual
awakening, including frank conversations about masturbation, which come
off as creepy as anything this year (I just thank my dad for not having
these discussions with me when I was growing up).  One would think
Solandz would take advantage of these people, make them fodder for some
kind of satirical insight into humanity.
But he doesn't.  Solandz keeps a droll but distanced view on all of
them, not at all judging them for what they do, and sympathizing with
them enough that they come off as human beings but not too much that his
depictions become clouded.  There's no main character, and there's no
real narrative voice other than his own.  He never looks down on these
people for being evil or unhappy or whatever, but merely sees them for
what they are: people struggling to become happy.
Solandz's tone is reserved, but he still allows tons of comedy to seep
through.  His scenes have a curious and wicked detachment, and his
characters are human enough to be funny most of the time.  He shows he's
a master of pop culture skewering by taking the horrible 80s Air Supply
song "I'm All Out of Love" and turning it into a hilarious love song,
then laces it with a curious sweetness I didn't think he was possible of
before this movie.  Though his characters are humorously drawn, he still
manages to make them human, though, which may be the film's strongest
aspect.  Despite their shortcomings and wonton desires, they're all
still seen as people like you and me, struggling with the usual
problems, and with the same ideals as all of us.
The acting by everyone is incredible, and it's hard to single anyone out
totally as the best.  Jane Adams, though, does the best job out of the
sisters, making her naive Joy into a gentle and lovable creature, and
Philip Seymour Hoffman and Camryn Manheim perform wonderfully in their
respective roles as two people who may or may not find love if they can
only get over themselves and their own insecurities (not to mention
pasts).  Dylan Baker has the toughest job, and his performance as the
pedophilic husband is perhaps the most moving of the year.  He dares to
make him a human being, and manages to make his desire to succumb to his
weakness one of the easiest to relate to, even if we're not relating to
his own personal desire.  Everything's worth it just for that scene
where he has a wrenching heart-to-heart with his son towards the end,
where he lets all the truth pour out without any filter.  This guy's so
good that if this suddenly became a huge hit, he'd come down with
Anthony Perkins disease, and never work again, at least not notably.
Although "Happiness" is a rather unnerrving experience to watch, it's
nevertheless essential to view because out of all the films I've seen
this year, this may be the most truthful about humanity (and I know I've
said that at least once this year), and may be the most shockingly
disturbing.  You walk out with mixed feelings: you enjoyed it, but then
again, you kinda didn't.  But its strength lies in the fact that it
admits to not knowing what happiness is, but rather that it at least
knows that happiness is not getting what you most desire.
Homepage at: htttp://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com
Writer-director Todd Solondz' third full-length feature made plenty of "Best
of 1998" lists, but made only one list of mine this year, and that's the one
at the unfortunate end of the cinematic totem pole. His second film was the
critically acclaimed Sundance sensation WELCOME TO THE DOLLHOUSE, but I
believe that it is the title to his first movie, that essentially describes
this year's film, FEAR, ANXIETY AND DEPRESSION.
PLOT:
Vignettes of several dysfunctional people all linked together through the
lives of three diametric sisters. One sister is a very successful novelist.
The other is a housewife, whose husband hides an extremely dark secret about
himself, and the third is a 30-something loser, who still has no clue as to
what she wants to do with her life. Their parents are also part of the
package, as the film serpentines its way through the troubles, perversions
and sexual dichotomy of many of its happily-challenged subjects.
CRITIQUE:
This is a bad movie. Crap served surreptitiously on an independent tray of
arty pretension and highbrow entertainment. Some of its problems: It's too
long and runs at a snails pace. It's uninteresting and unentertaining. It's
not funny and contains very little human drama. But even worse than that, it
pretends to be something terribly insightful and revealing, when really it's
just boring and obviously shocking. It's pretentious and might actually by
enjoyed by those who like figuring out the "true meaning" of a film or its
characters' intentions, but for all the rest of us, who like to go to a
movie theatre, order some nachos, and enjoy ourselves, this one is a lost
cause. I'm trying to think of one redeemable quality in this film, but I
just can't figure one out. There's a regular husband-guy ("Mr. Rogers on
acid" as per the Arrow's comments) who lives a double as a pedophile.
Hmmmm....yes, yes, how utterly insightful and shocking. *Yawn* Ironic as it
all may be, I didn't care for the characters, their lives, or this film.
So is this film a satire or a true reflection of the lives of many of our
contemporaries living amongst us today? The truth is that I just don't know.
The film was very uneven in that sense, and had plenty of scenes featuring
real-life dramatic situations, while others, clearly indicated its "tongue
and cheekness". The point is that I couldn't figure it out, cared even less,
and I just didn't appreciate any of the tragic characters or anything that
the film had to say. Am I too much of a simpleton, and am I missing the
"bigger picture" of what Mr. Solondz is attempting to tell us in his oh-so
subtle and annoying depression-fest? Perhaps.
The bottom line is that as a great movie lover, I generally tend to find
something nice to say about most films. In that sense, this movie did offer
some true and realistic performances by its cast, especially Dylan Baker,
who was excellent as the husband with the secret, and Jane Adams as the
pathetic loser sister. But other than that, please don't see this movie
unless you also enjoyed other self-indulgent indie pieces such as THE DOOM
GENERATION (3/10) and FRIENDS AND NEIGHBORS (5.5/10). And another thing, a
few scenes of masturbation in a film, mixed with plenty of shots of cum
flying around do not an insightful, real and good indie movie make. We must
always remember that a film must be interesting or insightful, or at the
very least, entertaining. This movie struck out on all three counts. Where
are the Tarantinos and Kevin Smiths when you need 'em?
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Director Todd Solondz had a small cameo in AS GOOD AS IT GETS (7.5/10) as a
passenger on a bus. Solondz was born in Newark, NJ, and grew up in the
suburbs. At New York University Film School, he made three award-winning
short films.
This film was dumped by Universal's October Films, and picked up by the
production company Good Machine.
Camryn Manheim (the overweight woman in this film) received a master's
degree in drama in 1987 from New York University.
The mother in this film, actress Louise Lasser, was married to
writer/director Woody Allen from 1966-69, and starred in four of his films,
including the amazing BANANAS (8/10).
Actor Philip Seymour Hoffman has been in 20 films since 1991. He graduated
from NYU's Tisch School of the Arts.
You might remember actress Cynthia Stevenson as the relentless character of
Doris, Norm's secretary, on the popular TV sitcom "Cheers".
Two members from TV's "Saturday Night Live" cast list make cameos in this
picture. Jon Lovitz from SNL past, and Molly Shannon from SNL present.

Author
Michael Dequina
No other film released this year is likely to cause the storm of
controversy that Todd Solondz's _Happiness_ is most certain to stir.  A
bold, provocative look at some truly miserable lives in American suburbia,
this beyond-black comedy offers some queasily subversive laughs--while at
the same time shocking and, more than likely, offending everyone.  It is a
brave, brilliantly realized piece of work, one that will be debated about
for years to come.
_Happiness_ follows a broad Altman-esque cast of characters, all of whom
are linked somehow, as they attempt to find happiness--or some reasonable
facsimile thereof.  At the core of this canvas are the three Jordan
sisters: Joy (Jane Adams), Helen (Lara Flynn Boyle), and Trish (Cynthia
Stevenson), daughters of long-unhappily-marrieds Lenny (Ben Gazzara) and
Mona (Louise Lasser).  Down-on-her-luck Joy, miserable after losing
boyfriend Andy (Jon Lovitz), attempts to find fulfillment teaching at a
school for adult refugees, where she meets Vlad (Jared Harris), a shady but
alluring Russian.  Sophisticated Helen is a successful writer, but she
yearns for raw emotional authenticity, which she attempts to find through a
twisted pas de deux with an obscene phone caller--whom she doesn't know is
her slobby but completely innocuous neighbor Allen (Phillip Seymour
Hoffman), who, in turn, is quietly pursued by his other, far less glam
neighbor, Kristina (Camryn Manheim).  Trish, married with three children,
appears to be the one sister who has her life together.  Little does she
know that she doesn't.  Her shrink husband Bill (Dylan Baker) has a problem
suppressing certain sexual impulses... involving prepubescent boys.
The pedophilia subplot is certain to be _Happiness_'s most controversial,
but not because the issue is taken lightly; in fact, it is the only story
in the film that is _not_ played for laughs.  What makes the topic even
more disturbing to viewers (myself included) is the brutal honesty with
which it is handled.  Bill is certainly a monster, but Solondz and Baker
refuse to let the viewer off the hook, infusing the character with genuine
humanity.  The rub is, Bill knows and admits that he's a monster--it's just
that he cannot control his urges.  His problem culminates in a
heartbreaking and, at the same time, highly upsetting scene where he comes
clean, with blunt frankness, about his actions to his son Billy (Rufus Read).
This gravely serious subplot may seem out of place in a film that is a
comedy (albeit one that is seriously warped), but its inclusion is
justified.  Sick as he is, Bill is the only character who actually finds
"happiness" during the film, freely indulging in his taboo desires.
Everyone else fails to come close, and while their misery can be and often
is laughed at, the pain is real.  The sight of dumpy Allen calling random
women in the phone book in hopes of getting off is funny, but his
loneliness is genuinely sad; the same is the case with Kristina, who is
often shrugged off with a giggle as a pathetic loser.  Joy tries to do her
best to do good, but her often comical failures are failures nonetheless,
much like how Helen's ridiculous desperation, is, in the end, desperation.
Solondz described his film as being about "how people always struggle to
make a connection."  Everyone in _Happiness_ is searching for some type of
connection, but, in fact, they are already connected with everyone
else--through their collective isolation.  The issue, then, is not
connection with others, but connection with themselves.  Bill comes to know
who and what he is, and for one brief moment, he is happy.  By the end of
the film, one wonders if everyone else--or oneself--will ever be able to
follow suit.
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@iname.com   |  michael_jordan@geocities.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site: http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline: http://www.HollywoodHotline.com

Author
Matt Williams
Don't be fooled by the title.  There is happiness in Todd Solondz'
latest film, but it's not exactly what you would expect.  The film
explores several unhappy (and, in some cases, extremely dysfunctional)
people in their quest to find "happiness", wherever they can. Sometimes,
it is in the oddest and most unusual depths.
The film centers on the lives of three dysfunctional sisters, and the
dysfunctional people around them.  First of all, there's Joy (Jane
Adams), who starts out the movie with a painful breakup with her latest
loser boyfriend (Jon Lovitz).
Joy's sister, Helen (Lara Flynn Boyle), is an outwardly successful
woman, beautiful and intelligent.  That's probably what attracts the
attention of her neighbor, Allen (Philip Seymour Hoffman), the obscene
phone caller next door.
And finally, there's Trish (Cynthia Stevenson), a naive housewife
married to Allen's therapist, Bill (Dylan Baker).  Bill has his own
problems:  he's a compulsive pedophile serial rapist.  But, he still
tries to be a good dad to his son, while lusting after his son's young
friends.  And these are just a few of the sympathetic characters you'll
meet in Happiness.
A problem with Happiness is often a problem in ensemble stories like
this.  Some of the plotlines are considerably less interesting than the
others.  A good ensemble work needs balance...Happiness just seems
desperately uneven.
Surprisingly (or, well, maybe not that surprisingly) the film's most
disturbing characters are also its most interesting.  Heading out the
pack is Dylan Baker's serial rapist.  He's certainly not the type of guy
you'd want to spend too much time with, but he's fascinating to
watch...there certainly hasn't been another character quite like this
one before.  And then there's the insecure Allen, wonderfully played by
Philip Seymour Hoffman, who's so pathetic he's alternately frightening
and endearing.
In comparison, plotlines like the romantic travails of Joy, or the
separation of the sisters' parents seem hopelessly conventional and
bland.  The film establishes its own peculiar rhythm, but then
constantly loses it every time it trudges back to the mundane.
That said, even the interesting characters and plotlines here aren't for
everyone (if you couldn't tell just by the descriptions). Happiness is a
film that revels in depravity, and is definitely not a movie for the
easily offended (and perhaps many of the not-so-easily offended).
The movie is X-Mozilla-Status: 0009 treats.  Some are quite good, some
are quite bad, but you can be assured that you've never seen an
assortment quite like this before.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 Good Machine
 Director:  Todd Solondz
 Writer:  Todd Solondz
 Cast: Jane Adams, Dylan Baker, Lara Flynn Boyle, Ben
Gazzara, Jared Harris, Philip Seymour Hoffman, Jon Lovitz,
Marla Maples, Cynthia Stevenson, Elizabeth Ashley, Louise
Laser, Camryn Manheim, Rufus Read, Anne Bobby, Dan
Moran
   The song that permeates the sound track of this
groundbreaking film goes "Gonna find my happiness,/ Gonna
find my happiness/ ...Happiness where are you,/ You just
can't stay so far away."  Ask ten people what they want most
in life.  Nine out of ten won't say "a million dollars," "a trip
around the world," "a Beamer" or even "a great job." 
"Happiness" is, and always will be, the ultimate reward, a
concept that eludes perhaps most people whether rich or
poor, with a distinguished career or a menial task to perform. 
Todd Solondz's innovative film "Welcome to the Doll House"
hit the screens in 1996 and dealt with the pain of puberty
unflinchingly portrayed by a suburban family. Now the writer-
director has taken away the International Critic's Prize at the
1998 Cannes Film Festival and also the Metro Media Award
at the 1998 Toronto Festival with his two-and one-half million
dollar production, "Happiness."  Inspired by a tabloid story of
a Russian serial killer of children who surprisingly enough had
a stable marriage and a couple of kids, the story intertwines
vignettes from the lives of the members of a New Jersey
family as they interact with one another, their friends, and
their neighbors.  When the parent company of October Films
denied the once independent house permission to release the
film, the job was taken up by Good Machine, whose superb
rendering of a tale that balances humor with pathos is a
winner in every respect.
   Director Solondz capably ignores the usual code of
moviemaking, which mandates that dialogue move
unhesitatingly forward lest the audience become distracted by
uncomfortable periods of silence.  With clever colloquy
featuring pauses that would put a big smile on Harold Pinter's
face, Solondz cuts his narrative into slices of life often flat-out
hilarious and heartbreaking at the same time, skillfully
weaving the yarn into a gloriously textured fabric.
   The transcendent opening of the film is the short version of
what is meant by combining comedy with commiseration as
thirty-year-old Joy Jordan is on a date with the nerdy,
unattractive, inarticulate Andy Kornbluth (Jon Lovitz).  Their
conversation is hesitant, more like discharges of energy
followed by discomfiting intervals, as Andy presents an
expensive ash tray to his date, then abruptly and fiercely
takes it back explaining in no uncertain terms why Joy does
not deserve either the valuable trinket or him.  Joy's almost
comic bemusement and Andy sudden, unpredictable
savagery will serve as a model for the balance of the film.
   Mr. Solondz comes back from time to time to pick up on
Joy's love life, highlighting an amusing chance meeting she
has with a Russian student at a school for refugees and
selects others in the family in haphazard order to hone in on 
how they deal with their fundamental aloneness.  As head of
household Bill Maplewood (Dylan Baker) responds when one
member of his family complains of loneliness, "We are all
alone."  Surprisingly, perhaps, the ways we deal with this
existential fact has both comic and pitiful resonance: each
person in turn finds occasional moments of joy followed by
periods of dismal melancholy in dealing with the malady.
   While it would be difficult to choose which pairs of
relationships are most moving--that's how together this film
really is--those involving Dr. Bill Maplewood and his son, and
Allen's (Philip Seymour Hoffman) links to his neighbor
Kristina (Camryn Manheim) are most trenchant.  Allen is an
overweight, unhappy, 30-something fellow who acts hale-
fellow on the job but turns into a debauched creature in his
time off.  He combs the phone book at random for women
with whom he can have phone sex.  When he inadvertently
buzzes his next-door neighbor Helen Jordan (Lara Flynn
Boyle), he is surprised to hear her invite him to her place
where, of course, he is utterly unable to connect.  But he
does enjoy a momentary alliance with a homely neighbor,
Kristina, who seeks him out and, gaining his trust, relates a
bizarre story of rape and murder.  
   As a performer, Mr. Hoffman stands out as the comic hub
of the story, but it is Dylan Baker who, as Dr. Bill Maplewood,
proffers the most surprises.  Bill is an apparently successful
professional man who supplies his wife Trish (Cynthia
Stevenson) with a comfortable, bourgeois suburban home
with two lovely boys and a dog.  His love for eleven-year-old
Billy (Rufus Read) is touching.  He's the sort of dad we all
wish we'd had, one who listens attentively and honestly and
matter-of-factly answers the most amusing birds-and-the-bees
questions which the lad trusts him to resolve.  Billy is
envious: every boy in his class is able to "come" so, he asks
innocently and wide-eyed, "Why can't I?"  "Don't worry, you
will," replies the good doctor as though he were counseling
his son on how to dribble a ball down the court.  The coming
shock is foreshadowed as Dr. Maplewood relates a dream to
HIS psychiatrist, one in which he marches down a hilly plot
with an automatic weapon mowing down every man, women,
and child in sight.  (Perhaps it's true what they say about
shrinks; that they're all crazy...after all, why would someone
become interested in the profession in the first place?)
   That much can be absorbed by an audience.  But what
horrifies us is how this gentle, apparently stable and
successful professional man becomes attracted to his son's
11-year-old sleepover classmate, drugs him, and brutally
rapes the boy while he is sleeping.  This boggles the mind
and has made the film a cause celebre.  
   In a press conference following a critics' screening at the
NY Film Festival, Todd Solondz fields questions.  "Why,"
asks one member of the audience, "do you make Kristina a
killer?"  Replies the director, "It's easy to make someone
likable.  What I wanted to do is to show people whom you'd
want to embrace even with all their foibles.  You're still able
to embrace such a person. This makes a richer character."  
   "Happiness," a movie whose budget remained low because
Solondz refused to compromise and cast bankable actors, is
a richer movie.  No one could have done a more capable job
than Dylan Baker in portraying a father, a professional man,
who despite his broad knowledge of how the mind is
nonetheless unable to control his depraved passion for young
boys.  Solondz has splashed the screen with an array of
persons, each with a distinct makeup, all feeling alone and
organizing his or her life in an effort to dispel the feeling of
utter isolation.  When Oscar time rolls around, "Happiness"
may well be swallowed up by "Saving Private Ryan"--which
makes us regret that a separate Academy award is not
offered for the best film of each genre.  For the oxymoronic
category of comedy-tragedy, "Happiness" would walk away
with the gold.

Author
Matt Williams
Don't be fooled by the title.  There is happiness in Todd Solondz'
latest film, but it's not exactly what you would expect.  The film
explores several unhappy (and, in some cases, extremely dysfunctional)
people in their quest to find "happiness", wherever they can. Sometimes,
it is in the oddest and most unusual depths.
The film centers on the lives of three dysfunctional sisters, and the
dysfunctional people around them.  First of all, there's Joy (Jane
Adams), who starts out the movie with a painful breakup with her latest
loser boyfriend (Jon Lovitz).
Joy's sister, Helen (Lara Flynn Boyle), is an outwardly successful
woman, beautiful and intelligent.  That's probably what attracts the
attention of her neighbor, Allen (Philip Seymour Hoffman), the obscene
phone caller next door.
And finally, there's Trish (Cynthia Stevenson), a naive housewife
married to Allen's therapist, Bill (Dylan Baker).  Bill has his own
problems:  he's a compulsive pedophile serial rapist.  But, he still
tries to be a good dad to his son, while lusting after his son's young
friends.  And these are just a few of the sympathetic characters you'll
meet in Happiness.
A problem with Happiness is often a problem in ensemble stories like
this.  Some of the plotlines are considerably less interesting than the
others.  A good ensemble work needs balance...Happiness just seems
desperately uneven.
Surprisingly (or, well, maybe not that surprisingly) the film's most
disturbing characters are also its most interesting.  Heading out the
pack is Dylan Baker's serial rapist.  He's certainly not the type of guy
you'd want to spend too much time with, but he's fascinating to
watch...there certainly hasn't been another character quite like this
one before.  And then there's the insecure Allen, wonderfully played by
Philip Seymour Hoffman, who's so pathetic he's alternately frightening
and endearing.
In comparison, plotlines like the romantic travails of Joy, or the
separation of the sisters' parents seem hopelessly conventional and
bland.  The film establishes its own peculiar rhythm, but then
constantly loses it every time it trudges back to the mundane.
That said, even the interesting characters and plotlines here aren't for
everyone (if you couldn't tell just by the descriptions). Happiness is a
film that revels in depravity, and is definitely not a movie for the
easily offended (and perhaps many of the not-so-easily offended).
The movie is a mixed bag of unusual treats.  Some are quite good, some
are quite bad, but you can be assured that you've never seen an
assortment quite like this before.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Author
Steve Rhodes
For those of you who thought Neil LaBute's latest cinematic diatribe,
YOUR FRIENDS & NEIGHBORS, was too upbeat, HAPPINESS is just the film for
you.
Writer and director Todd Solondz, who burst onto the motion picture
landscape a couple of years ago with the widely acclaimed WELCOME TO THE
DOLLHOUSE, is back with his second film, HAPPINESS, which is about
people who are anything but.
(For the record, I had Solondz's first picture at the absolute top of my
best of the year list in 1996.  It was the best example in years of what
an indie film could be.  It had unknown actors in a low budget
production that had more insights and depth than ten normal films.  The
actors in it have not had much subsequent success, but, since the
movie's brilliance stemmed mainly from the director's creative energies,
Solondz's second film has been much anticipated.)
The first pair of the many bitterly cruel and shallow characters we meet
in HAPPINESS are Joy Jordan and Andy Kornbluth, played by Jane Adams and
Jon Lovitz.  At a fancy restaurant, Joy is breaking up with Andy.
Devastated, Andy wants to know if it is because there is someone else.
"No," a smiling Joy reassures him.  "It's you."  And Joy is the nicest
character in the movie.  Andy comes unglued with this brutal display of
honesty.
Critics see such a wide variety of films that we become fairly thick
skinned, but this film managed to create major feelings of revulsion in
me.  HAPPINESS, a probable winner in the "downer movie of the decade"
category, tries hard to shock its audience and succeeds.  Murder,
masturbation, pedophilia, suicide and numerous forms of vicious human
behavior, it has them all in abundance.
Unlike his mesmerizing first endeavor, Solondz's second film offers few
insights, contenting itself with operating solely on the surface level.
Like a facade on a movie set, if you look beneath the glossy surface and
the talented cast, there's not much there.  The relentless happy music
may lure some into snickering, which would be rather akin to laughing
during a funeral.
Philip Seymour Hoffman plays a flabby, obscene caller named Allen, who
is almost incapable of even conversing with a female.  The details of
his sexual behavior during these calls are shown graphically and
unapologetically.
One of Allen's calls goes to Helen Jordan (Lara Flynn Boyle), one of
Joy's two sisters.  Gorgeous Helen is a writer who thinks her latest
book, "Pornographic Childhood," failed because her life has been too
tame.   As she flips through the book, we see that it includes poems
entitled, "Rape at Eleven" and "Rape at Twelve."  When Allen places an
obscene phone call to her, she uses "*69" to call him back to ask for a
date.
Cynthia Stevenson plays Joy's other sister, Trish Maplewood, a chirpy
housewife whose solution to Joy's depression is to suggest that she eat
red meat once a month.  Dylan Baker plays Bill Maplewood, the Ozzie to
Trish's Harriet.  They live a perfect suburban lifestyle.  Well, there
are a few flaws in their domestic bliss.
Bill has a recurring series of nightmares in which he is a mass murderer
with an automatic rifle, but they've been getting better lately.  At the
end of the dream, he no longer kills himself after gunning down everyone
else at the park.
Bill has bigger problems than his dreams.  He is a happily practicing
pedophile.  He makes no apologies for molesting his 11-year-old son's
male friends.  And when he keeps asking his son if he's been practicing,
he's not talking about his baseball pitch.
Besides the excellent acting, there are many things to admire in
HAPPINESS.  There is a great Dilbert moment, when Joy tells her fellow
cubical dwellers that an ex-cubical inhabitant has died.  The cubites
are abuzz over the tops of their little partitions trying, without any
success, to remember the deceased.  She gets so frustrated that she
finally agrees with them even though they have remembered the wrong
coworker.
And any movie that features an incessantly perky Marla Maples, in a
powder blue, real estate agent suit, giving advice on divorce has
something going for it.
Films can be hard to take and yet extremely rewarding -- IN THE COMPANY
OF MEN, for example.  It is fine for films to be hard to stomach if the
payoff is there, but HAPPINESS provides none.  It pushes the envelope of
decency only to see how far it can go, like some child pushing the
limits to see how much he can get away with.
Leaving the theater, your reaction is liable to be complete disgust as
if you have been violated in some insidious way. HAPPINESS is such a gut
wrenching experience that they should give out "I survived HAPPINESS!"
T-shirts in the lobby afterwards.
HAPPINESS runs needlessly long at 2:14 as if Solondz wants to prolong
the agony.  The film isn't rated but would be NC-17 for suicide, murder,
rape, masturbation, violence, sex, profanity, pedophilia, etc.  The film
is for adults only.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: www.InternetReviews.com

Author
Bryant Frazer
       Proving that the spiky and affecting WELCOME TO THE DOLLHOUSE
       was no fluke, writer/director Todd Solondz follows up with a
       harrowing comedy about pain, isolation, and dysfunction in
       New York and New Jersey. With a scope and ambition that
       serves him well, Solondz cross-cuts his narrative among the
       stories of an extended family, crafting a remarkably coherent
       story out of these increasingly disquieting vignettes. Think
       of Altman's SHORT CUTS reimagined for the East Coast, or Neil
       La Bute's YOUR FRIENDS AND NEIGHBORS with less smug distance.
       The key difference between Solondz and La Bute? Compassion.
       Photographs of Solondz suggest a bespectacled geek who bears
       a close resemblance to Dawn Wiener, the girl who slogged
       through DOLLHOUSE's bleak junior high school universe. That
       persona seems to have splintered in Happiness into myriad
       character types. There's Helen Jordan (Lara Flynn Boyle), a
       black-clad poet who knocks 'em dead at readings and book
       signings, but secretly believes her work is presumptuous and
       insincere. In search of gritty experience, Helen is intrigued
       by an obscene phone call from Allen (Philip Seymour Hoffman),
       an overweight basket case who's working his way through the
       phone book, masturbating bitterly.
       Allen also rings Helen's sister Joy (Jane Adams), a
       soft-spoken songwriter who's emotionally pummelled by the
       equally needy people around her. (Pretending to be an
       acquaintance, he asks her what she's wearing and she responds
       sweetly and naively, unaware that she's being had.) The third
       sister, and the only one to have married, is Trish (Cynthia
       Stevenson), who has a husband, a home, and a family -- the
       kind of life that Helen claims to covet. The neighbor kids
       call Trish's psychiatrist husband (Dylan Baker) "Dr.
       Maplewood." Bill Maplewood seems to be a gentle,
       understanding father, but he's also a pedophile spiralling
       out of control. In a sequence that's both wryly comic and
       horrific, he slips a Mickey into a boy's tuna sandwich during
       a sleepover, the better to take advantage of him. What's most
       heartbreaking is the relationship between Bill and his son,
       who share an uncommon (and unsettling, given the context)
       candor about sex. The whole film moves inexorably toward a
       wrenching conversation between the two that once again
       crystallizes Solondz' regard for childhood as trial by fire.
       If the synopsis above sounds like it may be too much to take
       in one 134-minute sitting, be grateful I haven't described
       the separation of the Jordan sisters' parents after 40 years
       of marriage (executed with sangfroid and loneliness by Ben
       Gazzara and Louise Lasser), the Russian cab driver's game, an
       early outburst from the spurned lover played by Jon Lovitz,
       or the fate of Pedro the doorman. Despite the considerable
       downers, what's most notable about Happiness may be its
       seamless fusion of low comedy and human tragedy. Solondz
       recognizes that, no matter how bleak this life may be,
       there's also something fundamentally absurd about our
       day-to-day struggle toward "happiness," and a reassurance to
       be had in the bitter humor that accompanies unspeakable
       sorrow. Accordingly, the performances he draws from his cast
       beg us to recognize that humor without resort to mockery or
       caricature.
       Particularly crucial is Baker's finely tuned portrait of that
       most chilling incongruity, a family man and child raper. In a
       film peppered with slatternly depictions of humanity,
       allegedly sick humor, and twice as much semen as I've seen in
       any mainstream flick, the one element that led Universal
       Pictures to disown HAPPINESS (which was set to be released by
       their adventurous October Films division) was its refusal to
       imagine Maplewood as a monster. All the credit goes to
       Baker's portrayal of a man who, calmly, quietly, and with
       little apparent soul-searching, leaps into his own abyss.
       Against the odds, Solondz makes all of these bits work as a
       whole through canny scripting and characterization.
       Sometimes, it's like watching a car crash. Individual moments
       may seem cruel, mean-spirited or even deliberately "shocking"
       (in a couple of scenes, he may go too far out on the limb in
       search of one more outrageous twist), but Solondz plays fair
       with these misfits and criminals, using them as narrative
       prisms, each reflecting fragments of our own lives back at
       us.
       Having crafted two movies that take a clear-eyed, deeply felt
       gander at the dark truths undermining the sunny ideal of
       American life, Solondz is more than just another hipster
       angling for shock value. He shares with the best filmmakers a
       wit, self-assurance and off-kilter grace that enable him to
       stare down his demons decisively, even as he conjures new
       ones. Having arrived on the stagnant "indie" film scene just
       when we needed him most, Solondz takes his place among the
       most fearless and incisive directors working today.
       --------------------------------------------------------------
       Written and directed by Todd Solondz
       Cinematography by Maryse Alberti
       Edited by Alan Oxman
       Starring Jane Adams, Dylan Baker, Philip Seymour Hoffman,
       and Lara Flynn Boyle
       Theatrical aspect ratio: 1.85:1
       USA, 1998
       --------------------------------------------------------------

Author
Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
4 and a half stars
Over the last decade films have stumbled over themselves in their
attempts to be "politically incorrect," and many have lost sight of the
reality that they intended to display.  Happiness, by independent
filmmaker Todd Solondz, never falls into that trap.  The film grounds
itself in the bleak and unforgiving modern world of its dozen or so
principal characters, and Solondz never relents from making his cold
surroundings feel that much colder.
Yes, the title is intentionally ironic, and yes, the film is very sad.
One scene, in which a character bitterly masturbates whilst ringing
random numbers in a phone book, speaks volumes about the isolation of
society as it approaches the new millenium.  Controversial, off-putting
and uncomfortable are three words that can describe Happiness, but
there's much more to it than that.  I propose that Happiness is not just
a brilliantly constructed social commentary piece, but one of the most
sarcastic, unapologetic and indirectly insightful black comedies ever
made.
The film regularly cuts to each of its characters lives, all of them
with distinguishable and quite unlikable personalities.  Perhaps most
tragic is that of Bill Maplewood (Dylan Baker), a married man who is
also a pedophile, and is attracted to his eleven-year-old son Billy's
(Rufus Read) friends.  Trish (Cynthia Stevenson), Bill's wife, is a
sister of Joy (Jane Adams), an aspiring songwriter who struggles to
maintain a happy spirit through emotional tribulations.  Successful
author Helen (Lara Flynn Boyle), also a sister of Trish and Joy,
receives obsessive phone conversations from neighbor Allen (Philip
Seymour Hoffman), who longs for her whilst being oblivious to similar
feelings towards him from Kristina (Cynthia Stevenson) a few doors down.
That's without mentioning Joy's boyfriend (Jon Lovitz), who doesn't
react well after being dumped, and the sisters' father (Ben Gazzara),
who abandons his wife in search for contentment in life.  Each of them
pursue their desire to be happy, in expense of everybody else, but delve
deeper into a world of uncertainty and despair.
Make no mistake about it; this is a painfully sad story.  Interestingly
enough, the film's dramatic side arrives second place in terms of focus
and ingenuity to its incredible sarcasm and wit.  The result is a
dialogue driven film that is both unnerving and at times very funny, in
a sadistic, glass-is-half-empty kind of way.  It's a neat trick that
Solondz uses to great effect, leaving viewers simultaneously shocked and
amused, scathed and entertained.
Exceptional performances are contributed from all cast members, who
dissect their characters with appropriately somber mannerisms,
displaying the sadness of a world corrupted by greed and populated by
people whose foremost desires are to pursue happiness.  During all of
Solondz's ranting and raving - his biting views on relationships, his
misanthropic philosophies on the togetherness of society, and even his
graphic shots of seamen - the film remains coherently structured, and
maintains audience interest for all of its running time.  Don't
underestimate the importance of Happiness.  See it, if not just to say
that you've witnessed the bleakest film this side of a Shakespearean
tragedy, and laughed guiltily whilst the actors in front of you sobbed
miserably.


Author
Christopher Null
     HAPPINESS has been mired in controversy for the entire year, and
not without good reason.  Put simply, HAPPINESS is one of the most
shocking films I've ever seen - this from a man who adores A CLOCKWORK
ORANGE.
     Not that it's particularly graphic or lewd.  Rather, HAPPINESS is
truly eye-opening for its theme: that everyone in this world is pretty
much a pig of some sort.  Those that aren't are doomed to be victims.
     Watching the film, you get the idea that director Solondz may not
be too far off the mark.  A disturbing investigation into the underbelly
of suburban New Jersey, the film tracks a few days in the life of one
highly dysfunctional family and the people with whom their lives
intersect.  Namely, an obscene phone caller, a murderous neighbor, a
pedophilic serial rapist/family dad, a suicidal loser... and that's not
even including the three sisters themselves.  There's *no one*
redeemable in this movie.
     And that fits it to a "T".  Unlike YOUR FRIENDS AND NEIGHBORS,
which showed a bunch of pitiful losers interacting with one another to
no ultimate end, HAPPINESS shows how a bunch of losers can watch their
lives get even more pitiful - and downright disturbing - when the seams
in society start to crack.
     HAPPINESS is not for everyone.  In fact, it may not be for many of
you, unless you have a strong stomach and a taste for the bizarre.  And
HAPPINESS may not be perfect, either.  It's too long, it rambles from
time to time, and there's probably one too many characters to follow. 
But the film's boundary pushing, gripping storytelling, and
truer-than-life moments make up for it all.
Director: Todd Solondz
Producer: Ted Hope, Christine Vachon
Writer: Todd Solondz
Starring: Jane Adams, Elizabeth Ashley, Dylan Baker, Lara Flynn Boyle,
Ben Gazzara, Jared Harris, Philip Seymour Hoffman, Louise Lasser, Camryn
Mannheim, Cynthia Stevenson
http://www.happinessthemovie.com
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director:  Todd Solondz
Cast:  Jane Adams, Jon Lovitz, Philip Seymour Hoffman, Dylan Baker, Lara
Flynn Boyle, Justin Elvin, Cynthia Stevenson, Lila Glantzman-Leib
Screenplay:  Todd Solondz
Producers:  Ted Hope, Christine Vachon
Runtime:  134 min.
US Distribution:  Good Machine
Not Rated:  graphic sexual situations, profanity, nudity
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
If you don't watch Happiness closely, you might think that
writer/director Todd Solondz hates his characters.  It's possible to
dismiss this as a dark, cynical look at a group of morally depraved
nutcases, but Solondz is nicer than that.  In Happiness, he draws an
intricate network of characters who are all messed up in their own ways;
what makes the picture work is the way it draws us in and forces us to
sympathize with people who would typically undergo societal bludgeoning
based on cultural standards.  It's a harsh, shocking film, but it's also
touching and often funny.  In short, it's one of the boldest films of
1998.
Like many independent films, Happiness doesn't center around one
character or storyline, but cuts frequently among a group of people who
are all related in some way.  One of the most prominent characters is
Joy Jordan (Jane Adams), a neo-hippie who can't hold a steady job or a
steady boyfriend.  She's an incredibly nice woman, and very pretty, and
really just wants to make a living by playing the guitar and singing. 
She has two sisters:  Trish (Cynthia Stevenson) and Helen (Lara Flynn
Boyle). 
Trish is married to Bill Maplewood (Dylan Baker), and has two sons,
Timmy (Justin Elvin) and Billy (Rufus Read).  Bill is a psychiatrist,
but he's also deeply disturbed:  aside from having fantasies about
killing innocent people in a park, he's a pederast who masturbates with
the aid of teen magazines.  One of Bill's disturbed patients is Allen
(Philip Seymour Hoffman), a pathetic man who describes himself only as
"boring"; he gathers sexual enjoyment by calling up random women and
verbally raping them.  
If this sounds like a colorful band of hateful people, then my
descriptions aren't doing them justice.  Indeed, they are all people
with severe problems, but Solondz observes his characters with
sympathy.  Take Joy, for example:  she's such a nice woman.  She may be
a little naive, but I never wanted anything bad to happen to her.  But
bad things keep happening to her -- she gets used by a Russian taxi
driver, an ex-boyfriend commits suicide because of her, her family
thinks of her as a failure (just to name a few things).  Every time
something bad happened to her, I wanted to give her a hug.  Adams is so
perfect for this role -- she has a kind, sweet face, and demure
mannerisms.  And she hangs in there, even when everything goes wrong.
But Joy is one of the easier characters to take.  It's harder to find
sympathy in Allen, because the prank calls he makes are so malicious. 
Hoffman is a superb, versatile actor -- you might not even recognize him
from some of his previous films (including Twister, The Big Lebowski,
and Next Stop Wonderland); his portrayal of Allen, with that gravelly,
fluctuating voice and squinting eyes, is simultaneously grating and
endearing.  Through Hoffman's subtleties, we are able to understand
Allen.  One of Solondz' greatest moments is halfway through the film: 
just when we think Allen is as pathetic is they come, he introduces us
to a large woman (Camryn Manheim) who falls for him.
In fact, all of the performances are first-rate, even in the smaller
roles.  Ben Gazzara and Louise Lasser, as the sisters' parents, convince
us perfectly of a couple who have been married forty years.  Lara Flynn
Boyle is wonderful as the pretentious artistic sister, and Stevenson is
also dead-on as the wife who thinks she has everything.  The most
important performance in the film, however, comes from Dylan Baker.  I
was deeply moved by his performance as Bill Maplewood:  here is a man
that, by society's standards, is nothing but a monster -- he rapes young
boys.  This is all most people need to hear in order to hate someone.  
But Solondz, while observing the act as a sickness, doesn't exploit it
by making Bill a monster.  He loves his son, and cares about his
family.  But he can't help himself, and while we don't excuse him for
that, we forgive him.  Ironically, that's where the controversy over
Happiness is coming from -- the picture makes us uncomfortable by
affirming the humanity of a man who does horrible things.  Baker's
performance is perfect -- he hints at his problem without making it
obvious to his family, but we always know that it's right there, fueling
everything he does.
Unfortunately, Happiness escapes greatness in the last ten minutes. 
Inevitably, Bill Maplewood is caught and disgraced.  But Solondz shows
us a scene in which Bill explains his crime to his son; this scene is
deeply affecting, but in the wrong way -- it reveals things about both
characters that I don't find believable, and it requires a conversation
to take place that doesn't seem realistic.  In fact, the entire
storyline is hindered by this scene.  Then, in an epilogue that feels
tacked-on, we are exposed to some gratuitously low humor that seems like
it belongs in There's Something About Mary.  But most of the film is so
good and insightful that any complaints I make seem largely
insignificant.  Todd Solondz' Happiness admits that real people have
severe problems, and by making us like his characters despite their
failings, he shows us in a very subtle way how nice it would be if were
were all more tolerant of one another.

Author
Kleszczewski, Nicholas
Last week I was priveleged to catch the original _High Noon_ on the big
screen.  Gary Cooper plays the everyman, faced with a life/death
situation, and despite every opportunity to run, despite the objections
of a scared and lazy town, despite the logistics detailing a hopeless
situation, he stays and fights.  He miraculously triumphs.
_High Noon_, alongside the stellar _Casablanca_ and _It's A Wonderful
Life_, are similar in the base content, which is no doubt why they are
among the most powerful films ever made.  Each tells of a protagonist
who, despite all objections of society, sticks it out, and does the
hard, but honorable thing.  Sometimes he wins.  Sometimes not.
_Happiness_ is the polar opposite of the films I just described.  In
this film, we have a society that is peachy-keen, family-oriented, and
"perfect"; we have characters who "have it all."  But just below the
surface lies the makings of thieves, perverts, murderers, and
pedophiles.  Despite all inclinations to secure "happiness", every
character's moral failings catch up to them.
Todd Solondz, who wrote and directed _Happiness_, raises the debate with
this situation (one of many): A popular grade-school teacher turns out
to be a drug-addict.  Should she stay or go?  Initially, we side with
the mother: this is a potential harm for our children, the future of
society.  But the father raises an interesting point: should the woman
be ostracized for having a terrible addiction?  If she could do her job
without jeopardizing the kids or her health, while she fights to be
free, then shouldn't she get the support of the community?  Suddenly the
issue isn't so black-and-white.
This father, played by Dylan Baker, is the pedophile in the film.  He
acknowledges he to his wife that he is "sick", but she is oblivious to
his cries for help--she wouldn't want to upset her "perfect" family.
Baker has an impossible role, and succeeds.  He is indeed, a very sick
man, but despite all indications of the contrary, is a loving father and
responsible husband.  His final scene with his son, is as heartbreaking
as it is awkward as anything you'd find this year.
Another character reaching for perfection is that of Joy Jordan, played
excellently by Jane Adams.  (She's the sister of the wife, played by
Cynthia Stevensen).  She's still single, still living in her parents'
house, and unable to keep a steady job.  A former boyfriend kills
himself.  Another steals her guitar and CD player.  She's by far the
most sympathetic character in the film, and also the funniest.
The third sister, Helen Jordan is a sultry, successful single played by
Lara Flynn Boyle.  She's a critically acclaimed writer, but sees the
shallowness of success, and is angry that people do not see her
shortcomings.  When she receives an obscene phone call, who insults her
and threatens her with rape, she becomes immediately attracted to the
caller, (unknown to her, he lives down the hall).
He is Allen (Philip Seymour Hoffman, with memorable turns in _Boogie
Nights_ and _Next Stop Wonderland_).  We would initially want him locked
away for good, but the film sympathizes with him.  He is obese, shy, and
socially inept.  The best scene is when he finally confronts Helen, she
invites him in, and they sit at polar ends of the couch, blank gazes.
There are many more characters here, but suffice it to say that this
isn't kiddie fare.  What's hard about reviewing (and praising) a film
like this is that we don't want to admit that we can relate to these
deplorable characters.  We don't want to exonerate the sin that has
become more and more commonplace in society.
Gratefully, the film doesn't explicitly show us the worst of these
crimes.  It miraculously maintains a light-hearted, breezy tone, coupled
with Air Supply and Debby Boone songs.  It is in this context that the
film forces us to examine these lives.  The "Hate the sin, love the
sinner" concept hasn't been more in-your-face.
Needless to say, box office predictions are very low.  I nearly
abandoned seeing this film, before forcing myself to catch it at a
second run theater.  I couldn't have been more surprised.  Despite every
plot detail pointing to the contrary, that this is truly one of the
sharpest, funniest, and most observant of films out there today.  It
deservedly won Best Picture awards at Cannes and Toronto.  It is
brilliantly photographed, which makes the material all the more
heart-wrenching.
While funny, I cannot express how adult the material is.  It is limited
in nudity and violence, and yet it is clearly NC-17 material, due to its
story and to humor that one-up's the jokes in _There's Something About
Mary_ (both films cover nearly the same terrain).  I highly recommend
reading the Screen It! review (www.screenit.com) if you are cautious
about racy material.
If I have any reservations of the praise, it's that the film ultimately
sides against the caring wife, in the dilemna posited above.  Of all the
negative characters in the film, she is the one who is bad because she's
so "good." Therefore, the script _must_ make her snide, haughty, and
self-righteous.  I don't think that's fair--"don't drink/don't
smoke/must be something inside."  Great satire is usually not
sympathetic to the one who stays and fights for what's right.
